District of Columbia statutes.
16-1058

Rules.

The Mayor shall issue rules implementing the provisions of this subchapter. The rules shall require that a subordinate agency director to whom a recommendation is directed by the Board shall respond in writing within 30 days of the issuance of the report containing the recommendations.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-296, § 2(c), 50 DCR 320